Utah statutes.
70C-2-206.   Settlement of claims.

(1)  A claim by a debtor against a creditor for an excess charge, other violation of this title, or civil penalty if disputed in good faith, may be settled by agreement for less value than the amount claimed, unless a court, as a matter of law, finds the settlement to have been unconscionable at the time it was made.

(2)  A claim, whether or not disputed, against a debtor may be settled for less value than the amount claimed.

